Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF990.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 124E.4, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. Sec. 2. Section 124E.4, subsection 1, paragraph d, subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: (1) The patientâs full name, Iowa residence address, date of birth, and telephone number. Sec. 3. Section 124E.4, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: a. The patientâs full name, Iowa residence address, and date of birth. Sec. 4. Section 124E.8, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: a. The department shall issue a request for proposals accept applications to select and license by April 1, 2018, up to five medical cannabidiol dispensaries , and may select and license up to ten medical cannabidiol dispensaries, to dispense medical cannabidiol within this state consistent with the provisions of this chapter . The department shall license new medical cannabidiol dispensaries or relicense the existing medical cannabidiol dispensaries by December 1 of each year. House File 990, p. 2 Sec. 5. Section 124E.8, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended by striking the subsection. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 990, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor